Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.100

Fraud in assignment for benefit of creditors.

Every person who, having made, or being about to make, a general assignment of his or her property to pay his or her debts, shall by color or aid of any false or fraudulent representation, pretense, token, or writing induce any creditor to participate in the benefits of such assignments, or to give any release or discharge of his or her claim or any part thereof, or shall connive at the payment in whole or in part of any false, fraudulent or fictitious claim, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 301; 1909 c 249 s 381; RRS s 2633.]

NOTES:

Assignment for benefit of creditors: Chapter 7.08 RCW.

Banks and trust companies, preferential transfers: RCW 30A.44.110.

Mutual savings banks, transfer of assets due to insolvency: RCW 32.24.080.